California, session 20252026, AB277.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 2.10 (commencing with Section 18980) is added to Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: CHAPTER 2.10. Behavioral Health Centers, Facilities, and Programs18980. (a) A person who provides behavioral health treatment, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) (d) of Section 1374.73 of the Health and Safety Code, for a behavioral health center, facility, or program shall undergo a background check pursuant to Section 11105.3 of the Penal Code.(b) This section does not apply to a person who holds a current and valid license issued by a California state licensing board, if the licensure process includes a fingerprint-based background check and the license is in good standing.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.